Idaho, session 2026, S1439.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-917, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-917. SCHOOL DISTRICT USE OF FUNDS -- SCHOOL MODERNIZATION FACILI-
TIES FUND.
(1)(a) Moneys distributed to a school district shall be used for school
facility construction, renovation, or maintenance needs or, in the case
of school districts electing annualized distributions, funds shall
be used subject to section 33-911, Idaho Code. Uses of funds shall
include regular and routine facilities maintenance, including preven-
tive maintenance, building repairs, and building security, and shall
also include periodic major facilities projects that involve plan-
ning, design, construction, renovation, retrofitting, and replacing
of buildings and building systems, components, and features, as well as
site acquisition, site improvements, and new construction.
(b) Any funds distributed by the state to school districts for facil-
ities must be used only for the purposes described in this subsection.
Any funds intended for facilities but used for another purpose shall be
returned to the state by the school district and deposited to the school
modernization facilities fund. If the school district fails to return
such funds, an amount equivalent to the misused funds shall be deducted
from the state's next payment to the school district pursuant to this
chapter or chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code.
(2) All funds shall be used for school facilities directly related to
the school district's core educational mission. No funds shall be used for
facilities with a primary athletic purpose.
(3) Each school district shall annually report to the state department
of education, in a manner prescribed by the state department of education, on
the planned and actual expenditure of moneys it has received pursuant to this
section.
(4) A model school facility council shall be created by July 1, 2024,
to research, adopt, and recommend a model school facility plan that schools
shall abide by when using school modernization facilities fund moneys pur-
suant to the plan adopted in paragraph (c) of this subsection. The council
shall:
(a) Be chaired by the executive director of the office of the state
board of education, with administrative support provided by the office
of the state board of education;


(b) Consist of nine (9) members, with three (3) members appointed by
the governor, three (3) members appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and three (3) members appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate; and
(c) Adopt a model school facility plan and submit it to the legislature
by July 1, 2026 2027, that:
(i) Outlines a clear plan for school facility construction, in-
cluding standardization for elementary schools, middle schools,
and high schools;
(ii) Considers potential variability of school properties, ob-
jectives, and goals; and
(iii) Consults all necessary experts to develop a thorough plan
for school facilities to guide the use of funds from the school
modernization facilities fund.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.